Utah statutes.
13-32-107.   Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(1)  the sale of a motor vehicle or trailer that is required to be registered or is subject to the certificate of title laws of this state;

(2)  the sale of agricultural products, forestry products, livestock, or food products other than those which are manufactured and packaged specifically for consumption by a child under two years of age;

(3)  business conducted at any industry or association trade show;

(4)  the sale of arts or crafts by the person who produced such arts and crafts; and

(5)  anyone who displays only samples, catalogs, or brochures and sells property for future delivery.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

